Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1644
Private postsecondary career school; discontinue operation; transcripts and records; preserved; permanent file maintained by department; fee.

If any private postsecondary career school now or hereafter operating in this state proposes to discontinue its operation, the chief administrative officer of such school shall cause to be filed with the department the original or legible true copies of all academic and financial aid transcripts and such other records of the school as may be specified by the department. If there is a change of ownership, the records shall be transferred intact and in good condition to the new owner and the transfer shall be verified by the department. The department shall maintain or cause to be maintained a permanent file of such records coming into its possession. A student requesting a copy of his or her transcripts which are on file may be charged a fee of ten dollars for each copy requested.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 48;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 43;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2848;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 44;

Laws 1999, LB 489, § 7.